src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
! 2.7.2019: snm: ^ConsDel er ikkje i bruk ved passiv, regelen er difor
! heilt utan funksjon.
! "Stemfinal Cons Deletion w Der/PassL 1"
! Vx:0 <=> (s:) _ %^ConsDel: %» s: o: v: v: ;
!  	where Vx in (d t) ;
!
! !€ aajvest%^ConsDel»sovvedh
! !€ aajvest0»0ovvedh
! => Feil: aajvetsovvedh
! => Rett: aajvestovvedh (frå aajvestidh)

!! Spesialregel for 'soptsesovvedh' < soptsestidh.
!! Ingen andre verb har st > s framfor passivderivasjon.
"Stemfinal Cons Deletion w Der/PassL, soptsesovvedh"
t:0 <=> s o p t s e s _ %» o: v: v: ;
 
!!€ soptsest»ovvedh
!!€ soptses0»ovvedh

!"No word boundary as hyphen in the beginning of a string"
!#:% /<= .#. _ ;

!"Force word boundary as hyphen between matching vowels"
! #:%- <=> :Vx _ :Vx ;        ! This should apply to only the surface side
! 	where Vx in (e a) matched ;

!!€ laajhna#aaltoe
!!€ laajhna-aaltoe

!!€ aerpie#eeke
!!€ aerpie-eeke

!!$ laajhna#aaltoe
!!$ laajhna#aaltoe

!!$ aerpie#eeke
!!$ aerpie#eeke


"Make hyphenation points visible when between identical vowels"
%#:%- <=> :Vx _ :Vx :Vx ; ! This should apply to only the surface side
 	where Vx in (e a) matched ; !nonsub


 
!---Duommá-Majja twol-practice, låt stå!
!%#:%- <=> :Letter _ :Letter ;! Don leat hui ceahppi, Toamma!  
!%#:%- <=> :Vz _ :Vy ;  
!    where Vz in (Letter) ;
!    where Vy in (Letter) ; 
!%#:%- <=> :Vy _ :Vz ;  
!    where Vz in (Letter) ;
!    where Vy in (Letter) ; 
!%#:%- <=>  :Vx _ :Vx :Vx ; ! This should apply to only the surface side
!	where Vx in (e a) matched ; 
 	
 	! matched = alltid er samme bokstav, f.eks jåvle-eejehtalleme blir det bindestrek, mens i aevjie#aesie blir det ikke bindestrek. 

!!€ Aevjie#aesie
!!€ Aevjie#aesie

! This must now not pass, since the relevant rule has been commented out, most
! likely because we want to handle this case somewhere else, where we can give
! the hyphen a high weight.
!!$ Aevjie#aesiede
!!$ Aevjie-eesi0de

!"Collaps three identical consonsants across word boundary" debatt#teknihke, musikk#kultuvre, trafikk#kultuvre
!Cx:0 <=> :Cx _ %# :Cx ; ! This should apply to only the surface side
! 	where Cx in (p t k) matched ; !nonsub
!
! ! !€ debatt#teknihke
! ! !€ debat0#teknihke
